Louisiana, session 2026, SB133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 32:296(A), 400.2(B), 400.3(C) and
400.7(B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§296. Stopping, parking, or standing upon the highway shoulder; driving upon the
highway shoulder
A. No person shall stop, park, or leave standing any unattended vehicle on
any state highway shoulder, unless such stopping, parking, or standing is made
necessary by an emergency, except:
* * *
§400.2. Controlling authority; compliance
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of
Transportation and Development shall be the state of Louisiana shall possess sole
and exclusive agency with jurisdiction over autonomous commercial motor vehicles
and automated driving systems and the Department of Transportation and
Development and the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of the
state police, shall implement the provisions of this Part.
* * *
§400.3. Operation; criteria
* * *
C. Prior to commencing the operation of an autonomous commercial motor
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 133 ENROLLED
vehicle without a conventional driver present in the cab, a person or entity shall
submit a written statement to the Department of Transportation and Development
Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police certifying that
the vehicle meets the requirements of this Section.
* * *
§400.7. Teleoperations; operation; criteria
* * *
B. Prior to commencing the operation of a commercial motor vehicle
equipped with a teleoperation system without a conventional driver present in the
cab, an owner, a remote driver, or the remote driver's employer shall submit a written
statement to the Department of Transportation and Development Department of
Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police certifying that the vehicle
meets the requirements of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.